Utah statutes.
53-10-202.5.   Bureau services -- Fees.

The bureau shall collect fees for the following services:

(1)  applicant fingerprint card as determined by Section 53-10-108;

(2)  bail enforcement licensing as determined by Section 53-11-115;

(3)  concealed firearm permit as determined by Section 53-5-707;

(4) application for and issuance of a certificate of eligibility for expungement as determined by Section 77-40-106;

(5)  firearm purchase background check as determined by Section 76-10-526;

(6)  name check as determined by Section 53-10-108;

(7)  private investigator licensing as determined by Section 53-9-111; and

(8)  right of access as determined by Section 53-10-108.



Amended by Chapter 58, 2010 General Session, (Coordination Clause) 

Amended by Chapter 58, 2010 General Session 

Amended by Chapter 283, 2010 General Session

